District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.21

Motor vehicle theft prevention teams.

(a)

For the purpose of this section, the term “motor vehicle” means any automobile, motorcycle, truck, truck tractor, truck tractor with semitrailer or trailer, or bus.

(b)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall have no fewer than 3 teams, comprised of no fewer than 3 officers each, whose primary responsibilities are the prevention of motor vehicle theft and the recovery of stolen motor vehicles.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3602, 51 DCR 8441
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3602 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3602 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
Short title of subtitle F of title III of Law 15-205: Section 3601 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle F of title III of the act may be cited as the Prevention of Auto Theft and Reckless Driving Act of 2004.